Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.15.020

Consequences of transacting business without registering.

Unless it is otherwise authorized to transact business pursuant to a state or federal statute, a foreign corporation transacting business in this state without registering with the secretary of state is subject to RCW 23.95.505.

[ 2015 c 176 s 2131; 1990 c 178 s 8; 1989 c 165 s 170.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.

Effective date—1990 c 178: See note following RCW 23B.01.220.